Arkansas, session 2025, HB1739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 44
UNIFORM ELECTRONIC LEGAL MATERIALS ACT

25-44-101. Short title.
This act may be cited as the "Uniform Electronic Legal Materials Act".

25-44-102. Definitions.
In this act:
(1) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities;
(2)(A) "Legal material" means, whether or not in effect:
(i) The Arkansas Constitution;
(ii) The Arkansas Code;
(iii) The Code of Arkansas Rules; or
*LGL059*
04-01-2025 14:29:46 LGL059

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1739
(iv) A state agency rule that has or had the effect
of law.
(B) "Legal material" does not mean material published by
the Arkansas judiciary, including without limitation the Administrative
Office of the Courts, including without limitation:
(i) A reported decision of the Supreme Court, the
Court of Appeals, a circuit court, or a district court; or
(ii) A state judicial rule.
(3) "Official publisher" means:
(A) The Arkansas Code Revision Commission for the Arkansas
Code;
(B) The Bureau of Legislative Research for the Code of
Arkansas Rules; and
(C) The Secretary of State for:
(i) The Arkansas Constitution; or
(ii) A state agency rule that has the effect of law.
(4) "Publish" means to display, present, or release to the public, or
cause to be displayed, presented, or released to the public, by the official
publisher;
(5) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in
perceivable form; and
(6) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or
insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

25-44-103. Applicability.
This act applies to all legal material in an electronic record that is:
(1) Designated as official under § 25-44-104; and
(2) First published electronically on or after the effective
date of this act.

25-44-104. Legal material in an official electronic record.
(a) If an official publisher publishes legal material only in an
electronic record, the publisher shall:
(1) Designate the electronic record as official; and
04-01-2025 14:29:46 LGL059

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1739
(2) Comply with §§ 25-44-105 — 25-44-107.
(b) An official publisher that publishes legal material in an
electronic record and also publishes the material in a record other than an
electronic record may designate the electronic record as official if the
publisher complies with §§ 25-44-105 — 25-44-107.

25-44-105. Authentication of an official electronic record.
(a) An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record
designated as official under § 25-44-104 shall authenticate the record.
(b) To authenticate an electronic record, the publisher shall provide
a method for a user to determine that the record received by the user from
the publisher is unaltered from the official record published by the
publisher.

25-44-106. Effect of authentication.
(a) Legal material in an electronic record that is authenticated under
§ 25-44-105 is presumed to be an accurate copy of the legal material.
(b) If another state has adopted a law substantially similar to this
act, legal material in an electronic record that is designated as official
and authenticated by the official publisher in that state is presumed to be
an accurate copy of the legal material.
(c) A party contesting the authentication of legal material in an
electronic record authenticated under § 25-44-105 has the burden of proving
by a preponderance of the evidence that the record is not authentic.

25-44-107. Preservation and security of legal material in official
electronic record.
(a) An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record
that is or was designated as official under § 25-44-104 shall provide for the
preservation and security of the record in an electronic form or a form that
is not electronic.
(b) If legal material is preserved under subsection (a) in an
electronic record, the official publisher shall:
(1) Ensure the integrity of the record;
(2) Provide for backup and disaster recovery of the record; and
(3) Ensure the continued usability of the record.
04-01-2025 14:29:46 LGL059

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1739

25-44-108. Public access to legal material in official electronic
record.
An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record that is
required to be preserved under § 25-44-107 shall ensure that the material is
reasonably available for use by the public on a permanent basis.

25-44-109. Standards.
In implementing this act, an official publisher of legal material in an
electronic record shall consider:
(1) Standards and practices of other jurisdictions;
(2) The most recent standards regarding authentication of,
preservation and security of, and public access to, legal material in an
electronic record and other electronic records, as promulgated by national
standard-setting bodies;
(3) The needs of users of legal material in an electronic
record;
(4) The views of governmental officials and entities and other
interested persons; and
(5) To the extent practicable, methods and technologies for the
authentication of, preservation and security of, and public access to, legal
material that are compatible with the methods and technologies used by other
official publishers in this state and in other states that have adopted a law
substantially similar to this act.

25-44-110. Uniformity of application and construction.
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

25-44-111. Relation to Electronic Signatures in the Global and
National Commerce Act.
This act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in
Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025, but does not:
(1) Modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C.
04-01-2025 14:29:46 LGL059

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1739
§ 7001(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(2) Authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b), as it existed on January 1,
2025.

25-44-112. Effective date.
This act is effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/M. Brown



























04-01-2025 14:29:46 LGL059